Illinois, session 104th, SB2727.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 9.15 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/9.15)7    Sec. 9.15. Greenhouse gases.8    (a) An air pollution construction permit shall not be 9required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 10equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 11defined by 40 CFR 52.21, as now or hereafter amended, for 12greenhouse gases or is otherwise not addressed in this Section 13or by the Board in regulations for greenhouse gases. These 14exemptions do not relieve an owner or operator from the 15obligation to comply with other applicable rules or 16regulations.17    (b) An air pollution operating permit shall not be 18required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 19equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 20defined by Section 39.5 of this Act, for greenhouse gases or is 21otherwise not addressed in this Section or by the Board in 22regulations for greenhouse gases. These exemptions do not 23relieve an owner or operator from the obligation to comply   SB2727- 2 -LRB104 15876 AAS 29097 b1with other applicable rules or regulations.2    (c) (Blank). 3    (d) (Blank).4    (e) (Blank). 5    (f) As used in this Section:6    "Battery storage resource" means any device or assembly of 7devices that is (i) either installed as a stand-alone system 8or tied to a power generation system, (ii) used for the primary 9purpose of storing energy for wholesale or retail sale and not 10primarily for storage to later consume on the property on 11which the device resides, and (iii) an energy storage system, 12as defined in Section 16-135 of the Public Utilities Act. 13    "Carbon dioxide emission" means the plant annual CO2 total 14output emission as measured by the United States Environmental 15Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 16Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor. 17    "Carbon dioxide equivalent emissions" or "CO2e" means the 18sum total of the mass amount of emissions in tons per year, 19calculated by multiplying the mass amount of each of the 6 20greenhouse gases specified in Section 3.207, in tons per year, 21by its associated global warming potential as set forth in 40 22CFR 98, subpart A, table A-1 or its successor, and then adding 23them all together.24    "Cogeneration" or "combined heat and power" refers to any 25system that, either simultaneously or sequentially, produces 26electricity and useful thermal energy from a single fuel   SB2727- 3 -LRB104 15876 AAS 29097 b1source.2    "Copollutants" refers to the 6 criteria pollutants that 3have been identified by the United States Environmental 4Protection Agency pursuant to the Clean Air Act.5    "Electric generating unit" or "EGU" means a fossil 6fuel-fired stationary boiler, combustion turbine, or combined 7cycle system that serves a generator that has a nameplate 8capacity greater than 25 MWe and produces electricity for 9sale.10    "Environmental justice community" means the definition of 11that term based on existing methodologies and findings, used 12and as may be updated by the Illinois Power Agency and its 13program administrator in the Illinois Solar for All Program.14    "Equity investment eligible community" or "eligible 15community" means the geographic areas throughout Illinois that 16would most benefit from equitable investments by the State 17designed to combat discrimination and foster sustainable 18economic growth. Specifically, eligible community means the 19following areas:20        (1) areas where residents have been historically 21    excluded from economic opportunities, including 22    opportunities in the energy sector, as defined as R3 areas 23    pursuant to Section 10-40 of the Cannabis Regulation and 24    Tax Act; and25        (2) areas where residents have been historically 26    subject to disproportionate burdens of pollution,   SB2727- 4 -LRB104 15876 AAS 29097 b1    including pollution from the energy sector, as established 2    by environmental justice communities as defined by the 3    Illinois Power Agency pursuant to the Illinois Power 4    Agency Act, excluding any racial or ethnic indicators.5    "Equity investment eligible person" or "eligible person" 6means the persons who would most benefit from equitable 7investments by the State designed to combat discrimination and 8foster sustainable economic growth. Specifically, eligible 9person means the following people:10        (1) persons whose primary residence is in an equity 11    investment eligible community;12        (2) persons whose primary residence is in a 13    municipality, or a county with a population under 100,000, 14    where the closure of an electric generating unit or mine 15    has been publicly announced or the electric generating 16    unit or mine is in the process of closing or closed within 17    the last 5 years;18        (3) persons who are graduates of or currently enrolled 19    in the foster care system; or20        (4) persons who were formerly incarcerated.21    "Existing emissions" means: 22        (1) for CO2e, the total average tons-per-year of CO2e 23    emitted by the EGU or large GHG-emitting unit either in 24    the years 2018 through 2020 or, if the unit was not yet in 25    operation by January 1, 2018, in the first 3 full years of 26    that unit's operation; and  SB2727- 5 -LRB104 15876 AAS 29097 b1        (2) for any copollutant, the total average 2    tons-per-year of that copollutant emitted by the EGU or 3    large GHG-emitting unit either in the years 2018 through 4    2020 or, if the unit was not yet in operation by January 1, 5    2018, in the first 3 full years of that unit's operation. 6    "Green hydrogen" means a power plant technology in which 7an EGU creates electric power exclusively from electrolytic 8hydrogen, in a manner that produces zero carbon and 9copollutant emissions, using hydrogen fuel that is 10electrolyzed using a 100% renewable zero carbon emission 11energy source.12    "Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit" or "large 13GHG-emitting unit" means a unit that is an electric generating 14unit or other fossil fuel-fired unit that itself has a 15nameplate capacity or serves a generator that has a nameplate 16capacity greater than 25 MWe and that produces electricity, 17including, but not limited to, coal-fired, coal-derived, 18oil-fired, natural gas-fired, and cogeneration units.19    "NOx emission rate" means the plant annual NOx total output 20emission rate as measured by the United States Environmental 21Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 22Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the most 23recent year for which data is available.24    "Public greenhouse gas-emitting units" or "public 25GHG-emitting unit" means large greenhouse gas-emitting units, 26including EGUs, that are wholly owned, directly or indirectly,   SB2727- 6 -LRB104 15876 AAS 29097 b1by one or more municipalities, municipal corporations, joint 2municipal electric power agencies, electric cooperatives, or 3other governmental or nonprofit entities, whether organized 4and created under the laws of Illinois or another state.5    "SO2 emission rate" means the "plant annual SO2 total 6output emission rate" as measured by the United States 7Environmental Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation 8Resource Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the 9most recent year for which data is available.10    "Total State-installed generation capacity" means the 11electric power industry capacity in Illinois by primary energy 12source as of September 15, 2021, as published by the United 13States Energy Information Administration.14    (g) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 15use coal or oil as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units 16shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 17zero no later than January 1, 2030.18    (h) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 19use coal as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 20permanently reduce CO2e emissions to zero no later than 21December 31, 2045. Any source or plant with such units must 22also reduce their CO2e emissions by 45% from existing 23emissions by no later than January 1, 2035. If the emissions 24reduction requirement is not achieved by December 31, 2035, 25the plant shall retire one or more units or otherwise reduce 26its CO2e emissions by 45% from existing emissions by June 30,   SB2727- 7 -LRB104 15876 AAS 29097 b12038.2    (i) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 3use gas as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units shall 4permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 5including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 6hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 7proven to achieve zero carbon emissions, according to the 8following:9        (1) No later than January 1, 2030: all EGUs and large 10    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emissions 11    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate of 12    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 13    miles of an environmental justice community designated as 14    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 15    community.16        (2) No later than January 1, 2040: all EGUs and large 17    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emission 18    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate 19    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are not located in or 20    within 3 miles of an environmental justice community 21    designated as of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment 22    eligible community. After January 1, 2035, each such EGU 23    and large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its 24    CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions 25    for CO2e, and shall be limited in operation to, on average, 26    6 hours or less per day, measured over a calendar year, and   SB2727- 8 -LRB104 15876 AAS 29097 b1    shall not run for more than 24 consecutive hours except in 2    emergency conditions, as designated by a Regional 3    Transmission Organization or Independent System Operator.4        (3) No later than January 1, 2035: all EGUs and large 5    greenhouse gas-emitting units that began operation prior 6    to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 7    General Assembly and have a NOx emission rate of less than 8    or equal to 0.12 lb/MWh and a SO2 emission rate less than 9    or equal to 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 10    miles of an environmental justice community designated as 11    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 12    community. Each such EGU and large greenhouse gas-emitting 13    unit shall reduce its CO2e emissions by at least 50% from 14    its existing emissions for CO2e no later than January 1, 15    2030.16        (4) No later than January 1, 2040: All remaining EGUs 17    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a heat 18    rate greater than or equal to 7000 BTU/kWh. Each such EGU 19    and Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its 20    CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions 21    for CO2e no later than January 1, 2035.22        (5) No later than January 1, 2045: all remaining EGUs 23    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units. 24    (j) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 25use gas as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 26permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero,   SB2727- 9 -LRB104 15876 AAS 29097 b1including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 2hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 3proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by January 1, 2045.4    (k) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 5utilize combined heat and power or cogeneration technology 6shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 7zero, including through unit retirement or the use of 100% 8green hydrogen or other similar technology that is 9commercially proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by 10January 1, 2045.11    (k-5) Except as provided in subsection (m) of this 12Section, no No EGU or large greenhouse gas-emitting unit that 13uses gas as a fuel and is not a public GHG-emitting unit may 14emit, in any 12-month period, CO2e or copollutants in excess of 15that unit's existing emissions for those pollutants. 16    (l) Notwithstanding subsections (g) through (k-5), large 17GHG-emitting units including EGUs may temporarily continue 18emitting CO2e and copollutants after any applicable deadline 19specified in any of subsections (g) through (k-5) if it has 20been determined, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of 21this subsection, that ongoing operation of the EGU is 22necessary to maintain power grid supply and reliability or 23ongoing operation of large GHG-emitting unit that is not an 24EGU is necessary to serve as an emergency backup to 25operations. Up to and including the occurrence of an emission 26reduction deadline under subsection (i), all EGUs and large   SB2727- 10 -LRB104 15876 AAS 29097 b1GHG-emitting units must comply with the following terms:2        (1) if an EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 3    participant in a regional transmission organization 4    intends to retire, it must submit documentation to the 5    appropriate regional transmission organization by the 6    appropriate deadline that meets all applicable regulatory 7    requirements necessary to obtain approval to permanently 8    cease operating the large GHG-emitting unit;9        (2) if any EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 10    participant in a regional transmission organization 11    receives notice that the regional transmission 12    organization has determined that an emergency, 13    pre-emergency, or conservative operations situation exists 14    or that continued operation of the unit is required, the 15    unit may continue operating until the issue identified by 16    the regional transmission organization is resolved. The 17    owner or operator of the unit must cooperate with the 18    regional transmission organization in resolving the issue 19    and must reduce its emissions to zero, consistent with the 20    requirements under subsection (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), or 21    (k-5), as applicable, as soon as practicable when the 22    issue identified by the regional transmission organization 23    is resolved; and24        (3) any large GHG-emitting unit that is not a 25    participant in a regional transmission organization shall 26    be allowed to continue emitting CO2e and copollutants   SB2727- 11 -LRB104 15876 AAS 29097 b1    after the zero-emission date specified in subsection (g), 2    (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as applicable, in the 3    capacity of an emergency backup unit if approved by the 4    Illinois Commerce Commission.5    (m) No variance, adjusted standard, or other regulatory 6relief otherwise available in this Act may be granted to the 7emissions reduction and elimination obligations in this 8Section if battery storage resources constitute at least 10% 9of the total State-installed generation capacity in the State. 10If battery storage resources constitute less than 10% of the 11total State-installed generation capacity at any time after 12the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 13Assembly, the Agency shall delay enforcement of the timelines 14in paragraphs (1) through (5) of subsection (i) and relieve 15generators of their obligation not to exceed their existing 16emission levels, as described in subsection (k-5). For a large 17GHG-emitting unit that uses gas as a fuel and is subject to the 18restrictions of subsection (k-5) of this Section, the unit may 19exceed its existing emissions during run hours dispatched by a 20regional transmission organization during emergency, 21pre-emergency, or conservative operations or run hours that 22are required to maintain system reliability.23    (n) By June 30 of each year, beginning in 2025, the Agency 24shall prepare and publish on its website a report setting 25forth the actual greenhouse gas emissions from individual 26units and the aggregate statewide emissions from all units for   SB2727- 12 -LRB104 15876 AAS 29097 b1the prior year.2    (o) Every 5 years beginning in 2025, the Environmental 3Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 4Commerce Commission shall jointly prepare, and release 5publicly, a report to the General Assembly that examines the 6State's current progress toward its renewable energy resource 7development goals, the status of CO2e and copollutant 8emissions reductions, the current status and progress toward 9developing and implementing green hydrogen technologies, the 10current and projected status of electric resource adequacy and 11reliability throughout the State for the period beginning 5 12years ahead, and proposed solutions for any findings. The 13Environmental Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and 14Illinois Commerce Commission shall consult PJM 15Interconnection, LLC and Midcontinent Independent System 16Operator, Inc., or their respective successor organizations 17regarding forecasted resource adequacy and reliability needs, 18anticipated new generation interconnection, new transmission 19development or upgrades, and any announced large GHG-emitting 20unit closure dates and include this information in the report. 21The report shall be released publicly by no later than 22December 15 of the year it is prepared. If the Environmental 23Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 24Commerce Commission jointly conclude in the report that the 25data from the regional grid operators, the pace of renewable 26energy development, the pace of development of energy storage   SB2727- 13 -LRB104 15876 AAS 29097 b1and demand response utilization, transmission capacity, and 2the CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions required by 3subsection (i) or (k-5) reasonably demonstrate that a resource 4adequacy shortfall will occur, including whether there will be 5sufficient in-state capacity to meet the zonal requirements of 6MISO Zone 4 or the PJM ComEd Zone, per the requirements of the 7regional transmission organizations, or that the regional 8transmission operators determine that a reliability violation 9will occur during the time frame the study is evaluating, then 10the Illinois Power Agency, in conjunction with the 11Environmental Protection Agency shall develop a plan to reduce 12or delay CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions 13requirements only to the extent and for the duration necessary 14to meet the resource adequacy and reliability needs of the 15State, including allowing any plants whose emission reduction 16deadline has been identified in the plan as creating a 17reliability concern to continue operating, including operating 18with reduced emissions or as emergency backup where 19appropriate. The plan shall also consider the use of renewable 20energy, energy storage, demand response, transmission 21development, or other strategies to resolve the identified 22resource adequacy shortfall or reliability violation.23        (1) In developing the plan, the Environmental 24    Protection Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall hold 25    at least one workshop open to, and accessible at a time and 26    place convenient to, the public and shall consider any   SB2727- 14 -LRB104 15876 AAS 29097 b1    comments made by stakeholders or the public. Upon 2    development of the plan, copies of the plan shall be 3    posted and made publicly available on the Environmental 4    Protection Agency's, the Illinois Power Agency's, and the 5    Illinois Commerce Commission's websites. All interested 6    parties shall have 60 days following the date of posting 7    to provide comment to the Environmental Protection Agency 8    and the Illinois Power Agency on the plan. All comments 9    submitted to the Environmental Protection Agency and the 10    Illinois Power Agency shall be encouraged to be specific, 11    supported by data or other detailed analyses, and, if 12    objecting to all or a portion of the plan, accompanied by 13    specific alternative wording or proposals. All comments 14    shall be posted on the Environmental Protection Agency's, 15    the Illinois Power Agency's, and the Illinois Commerce 16    Commission's websites. Within 30 days following the end of 17    the 60-day review period, the Environmental Protection 18    Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall revise the plan 19    as necessary based on the comments received and file its 20    revised plan with the Illinois Commerce Commission for 21    approval.22        (2) Within 60 days after the filing of the revised 23    plan at the Illinois Commerce Commission, any person 24    objecting to the plan shall file an objection with the 25    Illinois Commerce Commission. Within 30 days after the 26    expiration of the comment period, the Illinois Commerce   SB2727- 15 -LRB104 15876 AAS 29097 b1    Commission shall determine whether an evidentiary hearing 2    is necessary. The Illinois Commerce Commission shall also 3    host 3 public hearings within 90 days after the plan is 4    filed. Following the evidentiary and public hearings, the 5    Illinois Commerce Commission shall enter its order 6    approving or approving with modifications the reliability 7    mitigation plan within 180 days.8        (3) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall only 9    approve the plan if the Illinois Commerce Commission 10    determines that it will resolve the resource adequacy or 11    reliability deficiency identified in the reliability 12    mitigation plan at the least amount of CO2e and copollutant 13    emissions, taking into consideration the emissions impacts 14    on environmental justice communities, and that it will 15    ensure adequate, reliable, affordable, efficient, and 16    environmentally sustainable electric service at the lowest 17    total cost over time, taking into account the impact of 18    increases in emissions.19        (4) If the resource adequacy or reliability deficiency 20    identified in the reliability mitigation plan is resolved 21    or reduced, the Environmental Protection Agency and the 22    Illinois Power Agency may file an amended plan adjusting 23    the reduction or delay in CO2e and copollutant emission 24    reduction requirements identified in the plan.25    (p) The Agency shall adopt rules implementing this Section 26no later than July 1, 2026.   SB2727- 16 -LRB104 15876 AAS 29097 b1(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 102-1031, eff. 5-27-22.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.